Utah statutes.
78B-9-304.   Consequences of postconviction DNA testing when result is
unfavorable to person -- Procedures.
(1)  If the result of postconviction DNA testing is not favorable to the
person, the court shall deny the person's petition, and the court shall:
(a)  report the unfavorable result to the Board of Pardons and Parole; and
(b)  order the person to pay for the costs of the DNA testing unless the
petitioner has already paid that cost.
(2)  This section does not apply if the DNA test is inconclusive.
